Missouri, session 2026, SB1353.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 162.821, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 162.821,
to read as follows:
162.821. The district secretary shall keep a record of
the proceedings of all annual and special elections of the
voters of the district and of the proceedings of the board
of education. He shall make copies of the election notices,
contracts with teachers, certificates and all other papers
relating to the business of the district, and securely keep
the same. He shall maintain a correct plat of the district
and shall promptly notify the department of elementary and
secondary education and the county clerk of each county
affected of all changes in the boundaries of the district.
He shall transmit to the county commission and to the state
department of elementary and secondary education, on or
before the fifteenth day of August in each year, a report
embracing the following items:
(1) The number of children, male and female, attending
the public schools during the year;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1353 2
(2) Total number of days' attendance by all such
children;
(3) The number of days the public schools of the
district have been maintained during the school year;
(4) The number of teachers employed, male and female,
and the wages per month of each;
(5) Estimated value of school property owned and
managed by the district;
(6) Assessed valuation of the district;
(7) Rate of school tax on the assessed valuation of
the district;
(8) Cash on hand at the beginning of the year;
(9) Tuition fees received and credited to the
teachers' fund of the district;
(10) Public funds received by county treasurer;
(11) District tax received by county (or township)
treasurer;
(12) Amount paid on teachers' wages;
(13) Amount paid for incidental expenses;
(14) Amount expended for purchasing site, erecting
schoolhouses, rent and repairs;
(15) Amount expended in cancelling bonded indebtedness
and paying interest on same;
(16) Amount expended for library;
(17) Amount expended for legal services. If the
report does not include the amount expended for legal
services, then the attorney general may investigate the
violation of this subdivision and may bring a civil action,
including an action for injunctive relief, against the
school district. Such action shall be brought in the county
where the school district is located;
(18) Cash on hand at the end of the year;

SB 1353 3
[(18)] (19) Such other information as may be required
by the state board of education.
✓